Illinois, session 104th, HB5794.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Anti-Weaponization Fund Tax Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Anti-Weaponization Fund" means the Fund established by 8the United States Department of Justice as a result of the 9settlement agreement in Trump v. Internal Revenue Service, No. 101:26-cv-20609 (S.D. Fla.).11    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.12    "Resident" has the meaning given to that term in Section 131501 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.14    "Taxpayer" means a person who incurs a tax liability under 15this Act. 16    Section 10. Tax imposed. Notwithstanding any other 17provision of law, any resident of the State who receives 18compensation from the Anti-Weaponization Fund shall, within 30 19days after receiving that compensation, pay to the Department 20of Revenue a tax in an amount equal to 100% of that 21compensation.   HB5794- 2 -LRB104 22159 HLH 38389 b1    Section 15. Return. The taxpayer's payment under Section 210 shall be accompanied by a return signed by the taxpayer on a 3form prescribed by the Department.4    Any person required to file a return under this Act who 5willfully files a false or incomplete return is guilty of a 6Class A misdemeanor. 7    Section 20. Powers of Department. The Department shall 8have full power to administer and enforce this Act; to collect 9all taxes, penalties, and interest due under this Act; to 10dispose of taxes, penalties, and interest so collected in the 11manner provided in this Act; and to determine all rights to 12credit memoranda or refunds arising on account of the 13erroneous payment of tax, penalty, or interest under this Act. 14    Section 25. Deposit into General Revenue Fund. The 15proceeds from the tax collected under this Act shall be 16deposited into the General Revenue Fund.  17    Section 30. Incorporation. All of the provisions of 18Sections 4, 5, 5a, 5b, 5c, 5d, 5e, 5f, 5g, 5i, 5j, 6, 6a, 6b, 196c, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11 and 12 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act 20and Section 3-7 of the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act that 21are not inconsistent with this Act shall apply to the subject 22matter of this Act to the same extent as if those provisions 23were included in this Act.   HB5794- 3 -LRB104 22159 HLH 38389 b1    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Department shall adopt rules 2to implement and enforce the provisions of this Act. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.